Utah statutes.
53-6-306.   Inactive and lapsed certificates -- Reinstatement -- Continuing education requirements.

(1) (a)  The certificate of a dispatcher who has not been actively engaged in performing the duties of a dispatcher for one year shall be designated "inactive."

(b)  If a dispatcher having an inactive certificate becomes reemployed or subsequently reengaged as a dispatcher, the dispatcher's certificate may be reissued or reinstated by the director upon successful completion by that dispatcher of the certification examination.

(c)  The director may require a dispatcher with an inactive certificate to successfully complete the basic dispatcher training course before reissuing or reinstating certification.

(2) (a)  The certificate of a dispatcher who has not been actively engaged in performing the duties of a dispatcher for four continuous years shall be designated "lapsed."

(b)  Subject to Section 53-6-305, a dispatcher having a lapsed certificate shall successfully complete the basic training course and pass the certification examination before the certificate may be reissued or reinstated.

(3) (a)  A certified dispatcher shall complete annual training approved by the director of 20 hours or more.

(b) (i)  If a certified dispatcher does not complete the annual training requirement, then that dispatcher's certificate shall be designated "inactive," and after one year, shall be designated "lapsed."

(ii)  The reinstatement of an inactive or a lapsed certificate under Subsection (3) shall be governed by rules made by the director.

